North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 2. Capital Reserve Funds.

§ 159-18.
Capital reserve funds.

Any local government or public authority may establish and maintain a capital reserve fund for any purposes for which it may issue bonds. A capital reserve fund shall be established by resolution or ordinance of the governing board which shall state (i) the purposes for which the fund is created, (ii) the approximate periods of time during which the moneys are to be accumulated for each purpose, (iii) the approximate amounts to be accumulated for each purpose, and (iv) the sources from which moneys for each purpose will be derived.

History.

1943, c. 593, ss. 3, 5; 1957, c. 863, s. 1; 1967, c. 1189; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Guilford: 2007-255, s. 2; Mecklenburg: 2007-255, s. 2; Wake: 2007-255, s. 2; city of Greensboro: 2007-255, s. 2; city of Raleigh: 2007-255, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on former Article 10A of Chapter 153, corresponding to this Part, see 21 N.C.L. Rev. 357 (1943).

For symposium on municipal finance, see 1976 Duke L.J. 1051 (1976).

§ 159-19.
Amendments.

The resolution or ordinance may be amended from time to time in the same manner in which it was adopted. Amendments may, among other provisions, authorize the use of moneys accumulated or to be accumulated in the fund for capital outlay purposes not originally stated.

History.

1943, c. 593, s. 7; 1967, c. 1189; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 14.

§ 159-20.
Funding capital reserve funds.

Capital reserve funds may be funded by appropriations from any other fund consistent with the limitations imposed in G.S. 159-13(b). When moneys or investment securities, the use of which is restricted by law, come into a capital reserve fund, the identity of such moneys or investment securities shall be maintained by appropriate accounting entries.

History.

1943, c. 593, s. 4; 1945, c. 464, s. 2; 1957, c. 863, s. 1; 1967, c. 1189; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 15.

§ 159-21.
Investment.

The cash balances, in whole or in part, of capital reserve funds may be deposited at interest or invested as provided by

G.S. 159-30

.

History.

1957, c. 863, s. 1; 1967, c. 1189; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-22.
Withdrawals.

Withdrawals from a capital reserve fund may be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the governing board of the local government or public authority. No withdrawal may be authorized for any purpose not specified in the resolution or ordinance establishing the fund or in a resolution or ordinance amending it. The withdrawal resolution or ordinance shall authorize an appropriation from the capital reserve fund to an appropriate appropriation in one of the funds maintained pursuant to G.S. 159-13(a). No withdrawal may be made which would result in an appropriation for purposes for which an adequate balance of eligible moneys or investment securities is not then available in the capital reserve fund.

History.

1943, c. 593, ss. 11, 16; 1945, c. 464, s. 2; 1949, c. 196, s. 3; 1957, c. 863, s. 1; 1967, c. 1189; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 474, s. 16.

§ 159-23.

Reserved for future codification purposes.